Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 399.
SECTION 2. (1) The Adjutant General may pay a bonus to a member of the  Oregon Na-
tional Guard who:
(a) Reenlists or extends the member’s period of service in the Oregon  National Guard for
a period of time that is not less than three years; and
(b) Agrees to meet any other conditions required by the Adjutant General.
(2) A bonus may be paid as a lump sum or in installments  over a period of time not to
exceed the term of reenlistment or extension of the member’s period of service.
(3) To receive a bonus under this section,  a member determined to be eligible for the
bonus shall enter into a written agreement with the Adjutant General. The  terms of the
written agreement must include:
(a) The amount of the bonus;
(b) The payment schedule of the bonus;
(c) The period of time the member agrees to serve in the Oregon National Guard  in ex-
change for the bonus;
(d) The type or condition of the service; and
(e) Any other conditions required by the Adjutant General.
(4) If a member is called  into active service as a member of the Oregon National Guard
during a period of time covered by  an agreement entered into under subsection (3) of this
section, the period of time that the member serves on active  service shall be credited toward
the period of time that the member agrees to serve under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Except as provided under subsection (6) of this section, a member who  receives a
bonus under this section and fails to  complete the period of service or meet the conditions
of service for  which the bonus is paid, as specified in the written agreement, shall be liable
to repay the amounts of the bonus that have been paid to the member.
(6)(a) The Adjutant General may waive, in whole  or in part, the recovery of the amounts
of a bonus that have been paid to a member  if the Adjutant General finds that requiring the
member to repay the amounts of the bonus paid would be contrary  to personnel policy or
administrative efficiency or would be against equity and good conscience.
Enrolled Senate Bill 807 (SB 807-A) Page 1
(b) A member shall not be liable to repay the amounts of a bonus  that have been paid
to the member if  the member receives a discharge or release for the reason that the member
is the only surviving child in a family in which a parent or one or more siblings:
(A)(i) Served in the Armed Forces of the United States; and
(ii) Was killed, died as a result of  wounds, accident or disease, is in a captured or missing
in action status, is permanently  100 percent disabled or is hospitalized on a continuing basis;
and
(B) The death, status, disability  or hospitalization was not a result from intentional
misconduct or willful neglect of the parent or sibling and did  not occur during a period of
unauthorized absence.
(c) A member or a member’s estate shall not be liable to repay  the amounts of a bonus
that have been paid to the member and shall be entitled to any amounts  of the bonus not
yet paid if:
(A) The member dies or is discharged or released with a combat-related disability; and
(B) The death or disability of the member is not a result  from misconduct by the mem-
ber.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (1),  chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5533), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for Administration, is
increased by $2,500,000, to carry out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 807 (SB 807-A) Page 2